Illinois, session 104th, HB3533.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Professional Licensure Apprenticeship Recognition Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act7    "Apprenticeship program" means a paid on-the-job learning 8program that has been adopted by the Division of Professional 9Regulation of the Department of Financial and Professional 10Regulation or the United States Department of Labor.11    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 12Professional Regulation 13    Section 10. Provisions of professional licensure 14apprenticeships. 15    (a) The Department shall grant a license to any applicant 16who has done the following: 17        (1) completed a qualifying licensure apprenticeship 18    program; 19        (2) passed any examination required by the applicable 20    licensing Act; 21        (3) paid any applicable fees; and 22        (4) met any other criteria unrelated to training and   HB3533- 2 -LRB104 11281 AAS 21367 b1    education requirements under the licensing Act. 2    (b) If the Department denies licensure to an applicant on 3the basis that the applicant's apprenticeship is not an 4apprenticeship program that qualifies under this Act, then the 5Department shall issue such denial in writing and provide an 6explanation as to why the applicant's apprenticeship program 7does not qualify under this Act. The Department's decision 8shall be a final administrative action and shall be subject to 9judicial review. 10    (c) If a licensing Act requires an examination for 11licensure, the passing score of the examination shall be the 12same for applicants under this Section as for non-apprentice 13applicants. If a licensing Act does not require an examination 14for licensure, then no examination shall be required for 15applicants seeking to obtain licensure through a licensure 16apprenticeship program. 17    (d) The Department shall use the same licensing fee for 18applicants under this Act and for applicants under the 19standard licensing process. If a licensing Act does not 20require a fee, no fee shall be required for applicants who 21obtain licensure through a licensure apprenticeship program. 22    (e) The Department shall not increase the education or 23training requirements, including hour requirements, under a 24licensing Act for applicants who have completed a licensure 25apprenticeship program under this Act. 26    (f) The Department may work with relevant agencies,   HB3533- 3 -LRB104 11281 AAS 21367 b1including the State Board of Education, the Department of 2Commerce and Economic Opportunity, and the Department of 3Employment Security, to ensure that licensure apprenticeship 4programs that qualify under this Act are available and known 5to secondary and postsecondary students. 6    (g) The Department may consider licensure apprenticeship 7programs for professions that do not have a corresponding 8licensing Act as a path to licensure if, in the discretion of 9the Department, apprenticeship is appropriate. 10    (h) The Department shall not exempt a license obtained 11pursuant to this Act from any training or continuing education 12requirements required for license holders under the licensing 13Act to maintain or renew an existing license. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 151, 2026.